Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1017
Trust deed; instruments entitled to be recorded; assignment of beneficial interest.

Any trust deed, substitution of trustee, assignment of a beneficial interest under a trust deed, notice of default, trustee's deed, reconveyance of the trust property and any instrument by which any trust deed is subordinated or waived as to priority, when acknowledged as provided by law, shall be entitled to be recorded, and shall, from the time of filing the same with the register of deeds for record, impart notice of the contents thereof, to all persons, including subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers for value, except that the recording of an assignment of a beneficial interest in the trust deed shall not in itself be deemed notice of such assignment to the trustor, his heirs or personal representatives, so as to invalidate any payment made by them, or any of them, to the person holding the note, bond or other instrument evidencing the obligation by the trust deed.

Laws 1965, c. 451, § 17, p. 1433.